District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.75

Sale, lease, exchange, or mortgage of assets other than in usual and regular course of business.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 211, ch. 269, § 75
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 18
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(bb), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.75.
1981 Ed., § 29-375.
1973 Ed., § 29-929.